cvutils/data/lt/phon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%>

LEXICON Root 

Cns "weight: 1.0" ;
Vow "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON Loop 

 Vow "weight: 1.0" ;
 Cns "weight: 1.0" ;
 # ; 

LEXICON Cns 

b:b  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
c:t̪͡s̪  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
č:t͡ʃ  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
ch:x  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
d:d̪  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
dz:d̪͡z̪  Hard "weight: 0.5" ;
dž:d͡ʒ  Hard "weight: 0.5" ;
f:f  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
g:ɡ  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
h:ɣ  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
j:j Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
k:k  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
l:ɫ  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
m:m  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
n:n̪  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
p:p  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
r:ɾ  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
s:s̪  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
š:ʃ  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
t:t̪  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
v:v  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
z:z̪  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
ž:ʒ  Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
b:bʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
c:t͡sʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
č:t͡ɕ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
ch:xʲ Soft "weight: 0.5" ;
d:dʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
dz:d͡zʲ Soft "weight: 0.5" ;
dž:d͡ʑ Soft "weight: 0.5" ;
f:fʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
g:ɡʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
h:ɣʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
j:j Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
k:kʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
l:lʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
m:mʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
n:nʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
p:pʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
r:ɾʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
s:sʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
š:ɕ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
t:tʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
v:vʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
z:zʲ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;
ž:ʑ Soft "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON Hard
a:ɐ  Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
o:ɔ  Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
u:ʊ  Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
ą:äː Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
o:oː  Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
ų:uː Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
ū:uː  Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
   # "weight: 0.5" ; 

LEXICON Soft

i: Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
   Soft2 "weight: 1.0" ;
   # "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON Soft2 
e:ɛ Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
e:æː Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
ę:æː Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
ė:eː Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
i:ɪ  Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
į:iː Loop "weight: 1.0" ;
y:iː  Loop "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON Vow 

Hard "weight: 1.0" ;
Soft2 "weight: 1.0" ;
